Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.527.080

Chapter supplemental.

This chapter provides a complete, additional, and alternative method for accomplishing the purposes of this chapter and is supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws. The issuance of bonds under this chapter shall not be deemed to be the only method to fund projects under this chapter.

[ 2008 c 179 s 209.]